sv: Man överbord – systemtyp (MOB-systemtyp): AIS MOB-sändare; Båtmonterat MOB-larmsystem; EPIRB; MOB-stege/trappsteg; MOB-ljus; MOB-stav/markör; MOB-mottagare/basstation; MOB-räddningskit (paket); MOB-räddningssele/hiss; PLB (personlig nödsändare); VHF DSC MOB-sändare; Bärbar MOB-sändare (till båtens basenhet); Annat
lt-LT: Žmogaus už borto sistemos tipas: AIS MOB švyturys; Valtyje montuojama MOB signalizacijos sistema; EPIRB; MOB kopėčios / laipteliai; MOB žibintas; MOB gairė / žymeklis; MOB imtuvas / bazinė stotis; MOB gelbėjimo komplektas (rinkinio pasiūlymas); MOB ištraukimo diržas / keltuvas; PLB (asmeninis vietos nustatymo švyturys); VHF DSC MOB švyturys; Dėvimas MOB siųstuvas (valties bazinei stočiai); Kita
zh-TW: 人員落水系統類型: AIS 人員落水 (MOB) 警示燈; 船載 MOB 警報系統; EPIRB; MOB 梯子/踏步; MOB 燈; MOB 標示桿/標記; MOB 接收器/基地台; MOB 救援工具包 (套裝組合); MOB 救援吊索/吊架; PLB (個人定位設備); VHF DSC MOB 警示燈; 穿戴式 MOB 發射器 (至船隻基地台); 其他
vi: Hệ thống cứu người rơi xuống biển: Đèn hiệu AIS MOB; Hệ thống báo động MOB gắn trên thuyền; EPIRB; Thang/bậc lên xuống MOB; Đèn MOB; Cột/phao đánh dấu MOB; Trạm cơ sở/máy thu MOB; Bộ cứu hộ MOB (gói sản phẩm); Đai/cần cẩu trục MOB; PLB (đèn hiệu định vị cá nhân); Đèn hiệu VHF DSC MOB; Máy phát MOB đeo trên người (kết nối với trạm cơ sở trên thuyền); Khác
el: Τύπος συστήματος διάσωσης ανθρώπου στη θάλασσα: Πομπός AIS MOB; Σύστημα συναγερμού MOB σκάφους; EPIRB; Σκάλα/σκαλοπάτι MOB; Φως MOB; Κοντός/σημαντήρας MOB; Δέκτης/σταθμός βάσης MOB; Κιτ διάσωσης MOB (σετ); Ιμάντας/βαρούλκο ανάσυρσης MOB; PLB (προσωπικός πομπός εντοπισμού); Πομπός VHF DSC MOB; Φορετός πομπός MOB (σε μονάδα βάσης σκάφους); Άλλο
pt-BR: Homem ao mar sistema tipo: Sinalizador MOB com AIS; Sistema de alarme MOB montado na embarcação; EPIRB; Escada/degrau MOB; Luz MOB; Bastão/marcador MOB; Receptor/estação base MOB; Kit de resgate MOB (pacote); Eslinga/guincho de recuperação MOB; PLB (Sinalizador localizador pessoal); Sinalizador MOB com VHF e DSC; Transmissor MOB vestível (para unidade base da embarcação); Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava za čovjeka u moru: AIS MOB signalni uređaj; MOB alarmni sustav montiran na plovilo; EPIRB; MOB ljestve/stepenica; MOB svjetlo; MOB motka/oznaka; MOB prijemnik / bazna stanica; MOB komplet za spašavanje (paket); MOB remen / dizalica za izvlačenje; PLB (osobni lokacijski uređaj); VHF DSC MOB signalni uređaj; Nosivi MOB odašiljač (za baznu jedinicu na plovilu); Ostalo
ru: Тип системы «человек за бортом»: Радиобуй AIS MOB; Судовая система сигнализации MOB; АРБ (аварийный радиобуй); Спасательный трап/ступень MOB; Спасательный огонь MOB; Спасательная веха/маркер MOB; Приемник / базовая станция MOB; Спасательный набор MOB; Спасательный строп/подъемник MOB; ПАРБ (персональный аварийный радиобуй); Радиобуй УКВ ЦИВ MOB; Носимый передатчик MOB (на базовую станцию судна); Другое
tr: Denize düşen kişi (MOB) sistemi tipi: AIS MOB sinyal vericisi; Tekneye monte MOB alarm sistemi; EPIRB; MOB merdiveni/basamağı; MOB ışığı; MOB direği/işaretleyicisi; MOB alıcısı/baz istasyonu; MOB kurtarma kiti (paket); MOB kurtarma sapanı/vinci; PLB (kişisel yer belirleme sinyali); VHF DSC MOB sinyal vericisi; Giyilebilir MOB vericisi (tekne baz ünitesi için); Diğer
de: Typ des Mann-über-Bord-Systems: AIS-MOB-Sender; MOB-Alarmsystem (bootsmontiert); EPIRB; MOB-Leiter/Tritt; MOB-Licht; MOB-Stab/Markierung; MOB-Empfänger/Basisstation; MOB-Rettungsset (Bundle); MOB-Rettungsschlinge/-lift; PLB (Personal Locator Beacon); VHF-DSC-MOB-Sender; Tragbarer MOB-Sender (zur Boots-Basisstation); Sonstige
th: ระบบคนตกน้ำ: สัญญาณแจ้งคนตกน้ำ (MOB) แบบ AIS; ระบบเตือนคนตกน้ำ (MOB) แบบติดเรือ; EPIRB; บันได/ขั้นบันไดสำหรับช่วยเหลือคนตกน้ำ (MOB); ไฟเตือนคนตกน้ำ (MOB); เสา/เครื่องหมายระบุตำแหน่งคนตกน้ำ (MOB); เครื่องรับสัญญาณ/สถานีฐาน MOB; ชุดอุปกรณ์กู้ภัยทางน้ำ (แบบแพ็กเกจ); สลิง/รอกกู้ภัยทางน้ำ; PLB (สัญญาณระบุตำแหน่งส่วนบุคคล); สัญญาณแจ้งคนตกน้ำ VHF DSC MOB; เครื่องส่งสัญญาณ MOB แบบสวมใส่ (ไปยังหน่วยฐานบนเรือ); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema za primer človeka v vodi: Oddajnik AIS MOB; Sistem alarma MOB za namestitev na čoln; EPIRB; Lestev/stopnica MOB; Luč MOB; Drog/označevalnik MOB; Sprejemnik/bazna postaja MOB; Komplet za reševanje MOB (paket); Zanka/dvigalo za reševanje MOB; PLB (osebni lokacijski oddajnik); Oddajnik VHF DSC MOB; Nosljiv oddajnik MOB (do bazne enote čolna); Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de homem ao mar: Baliza MOB AIS; Sistema de alarme MOB montado na embarcação; EPIRB; Escada/degrau MOB; Luz MOB; Poste/marcador MOB; Recetor/estação base MOB; Kit de resgate MOB (pacote); Linga/guincho de recuperação MOB; PLB (baliza de localização pessoal); Baliza MOB VHF DSC; Transmissor MOB vestível (para a unidade base da embarcação); Outro
ko: 해상 조난자 구조 시스템 유형: AIS MOB 비콘; 보트 장착형 MOB 알람 시스템; EPIRB; MOB 사다리/계단; MOB 조명; MOB 폴/마커; MOB 수신기/기지국; MOB 구조 키트(번들); MOB 회수 슬링/호이스트; PLB(개인 위치 표시 비콘); VHF DSC MOB 비콘; 웨어러블 MOB 송신기(보트 베이스 유닛용); 기타
nb: Mann-over-bord-systemtype: AIS MOB-sender; Båtmontert MOB-alarmsystem; EPIRB; MOB-stige/-trinn; MOB-lys; MOB-stake/-markør; MOB-mottaker/-basestasjon; MOB-redningssett (pakke); MOB-redningsslynge/-heis; PLB (personlig nødpeilesender); VHF DSC MOB-sender; Bærbar MOB-sender (til båtens basestasjon); Annet
zh-CN: 人员落水救援系统类型: AIS MOB 信标; 船载 MOB 报警系统; EPIRB; MOB 救生梯/踏板; MOB 救生灯; MOB 救生杆/标记; MOB 接收器/基站; MOB 救援套件（套装）; MOB 救援吊索/起重机; PLB（个人定位信标）; VHF DSC MOB 信标; 可穿戴 MOB 发射器（至船载基站）; 其他
ja: 落水者救助システムタイプ: AIS MOBビーコン; 船載MOBアラームシステム; EPIRB; MOBラダー/ステップ; MOBライト; MOBポール/マーカー; MOBレシーバー/ベースステーション; MOBレスキューキット (バンドル); MOB救助スリング/ホイスト; PLB (パーソナルロケータービーコン); VHF DSC MOBビーコン; ウェアラブルMOB送信機 (船上ベースユニット用); その他
it: Tipo di sistema uomo a mare: Segnalatore AIS MOB; Sistema di allarme MOB montato sull’imbarcazione; EPIRB; Scaletta/gradino MOB; Luce MOB; Asta/marcatore MOB; Ricevitore/stazione base MOB; Kit di salvataggio MOB (pacchetto); Imbracatura/paranco di recupero MOB; PLB (segnalatore di localizzazione personale); Segnalatore VHF DSC MOB; Trasmettitore MOB indossabile (all’unità base dell’imbarcazione); Altro
bg-BG: Тип система за човек зад борда: AIS MOB маяк; Монтирана на лодката MOB алармена система; EPIRB; MOB стълба/стъпало; MOB светлина; MOB прът/маркер; MOB приемник/базова станция; MOB спасителен комплект (пакет); MOB слинг/подемник за извличане; PLB (персонален локационен маяк); VHF DSC MOB маяк; Носим MOB предавател (към базовата станция на лодката); Друго
fr: Type de système homme à la mer: Balise AIS MOB; Système d’alarme MOB monté sur bateau; EPIRB; Échelle / marche MOB; Feu MOB; Perche / marqueur MOB; Récepteur / station de base MOB; Kit de sauvetage MOB (lot); Élingue / palan de récupération MOB; PLB (balise de détresse personnelle); Balise VHF ASN MOB; Émetteur MOB portable (vers l’unité de base du bateau); Autre
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului „Om la apă”: Baliză AIS MOB; Sistem de alarmă MOB montat pe barcă; EPIRB; Scară/treaptă MOB; Lumină MOB; Prăjină/marcaj MOB; Receptor/stație de bază MOB; Kit de salvare MOB (pachet); Chingă/palan de recuperare MOB; PLB (baliză de localizare personală); Baliză VHF DSC MOB; Transmițător MOB purtabil (către unitatea de bază a bărcii); Altele
es: Tipo de sistema de hombre al agua: Baliza MOB AIS; Sistema de alarma MOB montado en el barco; EPIRB; Escalera/peldaño MOB; Luz MOB; Poste/marcador MOB; Estación base/receptor MOB; Kit de rescate MOB (paquete); Eslinga/elevador de recuperación MOB; PLB (baliza de localización personal); Baliza MOB VHF DSC; Transmisor MOB ponible (para unidad base del barco); Otro
da: Mand over bord-systemtype: AIS MOB-sender; Bådmonteret MOB-alarmsystem; EPIRB; MOB-stige/-trin; MOB-lys; MOB-stang/-markør; MOB-modtager/-basestation; MOB-redningssæt (sampak); MOB-bjærgningssejl/-hejs; PLB (personlig nødsender); VHF DSC MOB-sender; Bærbar MOB-sender (til bådens basisenhed); Andet
nl: Man-overboord-systeem type: AIS MOB-baken; MOB-alarmsysteem op de boot; EPIRB; MOB-ladder/-trede; MOB-lamp; MOB-stok/-markering; MOB-ontvanger/-basisstation; MOB-reddingskit (bundel); MOB-hijsband/-takel; PLB (persoonlijk locatiebaken); VHF DSC MOB-baken; Draagbare MOB-zender (naar basisstation boot); Anders
fi: Mies yli laidan -järjestelmän tyyppi: AIS MOB -lähetin; Veneeseen asennettu MOB-hälytysjärjestelmä; EPIRB-hätälähetin; MOB-tikkaat/-askelma; MOB-valo; MOB-poiju/-merkki; MOB-vastaanotin/-tukiasema; MOB-pelastussarja (tuotepaketti); MOB-nostoliina/-talja; PLB (henkilökohtainen hätälähetin); VHF DSC MOB -lähetin; Puettava MOB-lähetin (veneen tukiasemaan); Muu
hu: „Ember a vízben” rendszer típusa: AIS MOB jeladó; Hajóra szerelt MOB riasztórendszer; EPIRB; MOB létra / fellépő; MOB fény; MOB rúd / jelölő; MOB vevő / bázisállomás; MOB mentőkészlet (csomag); MOB mentőheveder / emelő; PLB (személyi helymeghatározó jeladó); VHF DSC MOB jeladó; Viselhető MOB jeladó (hajó bázisállomásához); Egyéb
cs: Typ systému „muž přes palubu“: Maják AIS MOB; MOB alarmový systém na lodi; EPIRB; Žebřík/stupátko MOB; Světlo MOB; Bóje/značka MOB; Přijímač / základní stanice MOB; Záchranná sada MOB; Vyprošťovací popruh / zvedák MOB; PLB (osobní lokační maják); Maják VHF DSC MOB; Nositelný vysílač MOB (pro lodní základnu); Jiné
pl: Typ systemu człowiek za burtą: Nadajnik AIS MOB; System alarmowy MOB montowany na łodzi; EPIRB; Drabinka/stopień MOB; Oświetlenie MOB; Tyczka / pławka MOB; Odbiornik MOB / stacja bazowa; Zestaw ratunkowy MOB (pakiet); Pętla ratunkowa / wyciąg MOB; Osobisty nadajnik ratunkowy (PLB); Nadajnik VHF DSC MOB; Przenośny nadajnik MOB (do jednostki bazowej na łodzi); Inne
sk-SK: Typ systému pre prípad pádu človeka cez palubu: Maják AIS MOB; Poplašný systém MOB namontovaný na lodi; EPIRB; Rebrík/schodík MOB; Svetlo MOB; Tyč/značka MOB; Prijímač / základňová stanica MOB; Záchranná súprava MOB (balík); Zdvíhací popruh / kladkostroj MOB; PLB (osobný lokalizačný maják); Maják VHF DSC MOB; Nositeľný vysielač MOB (k základňovej jednotke lode); Iný
en: Man overboard system type: AIS MOB beacon; Boat-mounted MOB alarm system; EPIRB; MOB ladder/step; MOB light; MOB pole/marker; MOB receiver/base station; MOB rescue kit (bundle); MOB retrieval sling/hoist; PLB (personal locator beacon); VHF DSC MOB beacon; Wearable MOB transmitter (to boat base unit); Other